District of Columbia statutes.
42-810

Mortgagee may redeem prior mortgage; prior mortgage may not bar.

If it so happen there be more than 1 mortgage at the same time made, by any person or persons to any person or persons, of the same lands and tenements, the several late or under mortgagees, his, her, or their heirs, executors, administrators, or assigns, shall have power to redeem any former mortgage or mortgages, upon payment of the principal debt, interest, and costs of suit, to the prior mortgagee or mortgagees, his, her, or their heirs, executors, administrators, or assigns; anything therein contained to the contrary thereof in anywise notwithstanding.

History

4 & 5 W. & M., ch. 16, § 4, 1692
Kilty’s Rep. 242
Alex. Br. Stat. 579
Comp. Stat., D.C. 237, § 26
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-263, § 1601, 48 DCR 991
May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 602(b), 49 DCR 2551

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-710.
1973 Ed., § 45-610.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-132 revived this section as of November 6, 2001. This section had been previously repealed by D.C. Law 13-263, § 1601.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-86, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2991).

Emergency Legislation

Section 2 of Act 14-188, the “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Emergency Amendment Act”, deemed approved Nov. 27, 2001, without the signature of the Mayor, provided that D.C. Law 13-263 shall not apply beginning November 6, 2001, through March 6, 2002.
For temporary (90 day) revival of section, see § 403(b) of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).